Utah statutes.
13-12-5.   Death of dealer or lessee -- Distributor to cooperate with heirs -- Offer to purchase -- Reasonable access to premises.

Upon the death of a dealer or lessee who operates under a marketing agreement, the distributor shall cooperate with the heirs or successors. Such cooperation shall include, but not be limited to, an offer to repurchase salable merchandise and equipment owned by the dealer at the fair market value not to exceed original invoice price and to permit the heirs or successors reasonable access to the premises for a reasonable period of time.

